en: Tenor trombone valve configuration: Dual valve (dependent); Dual valve (independent); Single valve (F-attachment); Straight (no valve); Other
es: Configuración de la válvula del trombón tenor: Válvula doble (dependiente); Válvula doble (independiente); Válvula única (accesorio en Fa); Recto (sin válvula); Otra
ro-RO: Configurația valvelor pentru trombon tenor: Supapă dublă (dependentă); Supapă dublă (independentă); Supapă simplă (atașament F); Drept (fără supapă); Altele
zh-CN: 次中音长号阀门配置: 双活塞（非独立）; 双活塞（独立）; 单活塞 (F 附件); 直管（无活塞）; 其他
el: Διαμόρφωση βαλβίδας τενόρο τρομπονιού: Διπλή βαλβίδα (εξαρτώμενη); Διπλή βαλβίδα (ανεξάρτητη); Μονή βαλβίδα (προσάρτημα F); Ίσιο (χωρίς βαλβίδα); Άλλο
hr-HR: Konfiguracija ventila tenor trombona: Dvostruki ventil (ovisni); Dvostruki ventil (neovisni); Jednostruki ventil (F-dodatak); Ravni (bez ventila); Ostalo
pt-PT: Configuração de válvulas do trombone tenor: Válvula dupla (dependente); Válvula dupla (independente); Válvula simples (anexo F); Direto (sem válvula); Outro
vi: Cấu hình van kèn trombone tenor: Van kép (phụ thuộc); Van kép (độc lập); Van đơn (gắn nhánh F); Dạng thẳng (không van); Khác
zh-TW: 次中音長號閥門配置: 雙轉閥 (連動式); 雙轉閥 (獨立式); 單轉閥 (F 調附管); 直管 (無轉閥); 其他
pt-BR: Trombone tenor configuração de válvula: Válvula dupla (dependente); Válvula dupla (independente); Válvula simples (anexo em Fá); Reto (sem válvula); Outra
nl: Tenortrombone ventielconfiguratie: Dubbel ventiel (afhankelijk); Dubbel ventiel (onafhankelijk); Enkel ventiel (F-opzetstuk); Recht (geen ventiel); Overig
pl: Konfiguracja zaworu puzonu tenorowego: Podwójny wentyl (zależny); Podwójny wentyl (niezależny); Pojedynczy wentyl (z kwartwentylem F); Prosty (bez wentyla); Inne
ko: 테너 트롬본 밸브 구성: 듀얼 밸브(종속); 듀얼 밸브(독립); 싱글 밸브(F-어태치먼트); 스트레이트(밸브 없음); 기타
sk-SK: Konfigurácia tenorového trombónového ventilu: Dva ventily (závislé); Dva ventily (nezávislé); Jeden ventil (F-kvarta); Priamy (bez ventilu); Iné
hu: Tenorharsona szelepkonfigurációja: Duplaszelepes (függő); Duplaszelepes (független); Egyszelepes (F-kvartszárny); Egyenes (szelep nélküli); Egyéb
sv: Konfiguration av tenortrombonventil: Dubbel ventil (beroende); Dubbel ventil (oberoende); Enkel ventil (F-tillsats); Rak (utan ventil); Annat
fi: Tenoripasuunan venttiilirakenne: Kaksoisventtiili (riippuvainen); Kaksoisventtiili (itsenäinen); Yksittäinen venttiili (F-lisäke); Suora (ei venttiiliä); Muu
bg-BG: Конфигурация на теноров тромбонов клапан: Двойна клапа (зависима); Двойна клапа (независима); Единична клапа (F-приставка); Прав (без клапа); Друго
de: Ventilkonfiguration der Tenorposaune: Doppelventil (abhängig); Doppelventil (unabhängig); Quartventil (F-Attachment); Gerade (ohne Ventil); Sonstige
nb: Ventilkonfigurasjon for tenortrombone: Dobbel ventil (avhengig); Dobbel ventil (uavhengig); Enkel ventil (F-tillegg); Rett (ingen ventil); Annet
lt-LT: Tenorinio trombono ventilių konfigūracija: Dvigubas vožtuvas (priklausomas); Dvigubas vožtuvas (nepriklausomas); Vienas vožtuvas (F priedas); Tiesus (be vožtuvo); Kita
da: Ventilkonfiguration for tenortrombone: Dobbelt ventil (afhængig); Dobbelt ventil (uafhængig); Enkelt ventil (F-vedhæftning); Lige (ingen ventil); Andet
th: การจัดเรียงวาล์วของทรอมโบนเทเนอร์: วาล์วคู่ (แบบพึ่งพา); วาล์วคู่ (แบบอิสระ); วาล์วเดี่ยว (ท่อต่อ F); ตรง (ไม่มีวาล์ว); อื่นๆ
tr: Tenor trombon valf konfigürasyonu: Çift valf (bağımlı); Çift valf (bağımsız); Tek valf (F eklentisi); Düz (valf yok); Diğer
fr: Configuration de la valve du trombone ténor: Double barillet (dépendant); Double barillet (indépendant); Barillet simple (attachement en fa); Droit (sans barillet); Autre
cs: Konfigurace ventilů tenorového pozounu: Dvojitý ventil (závislý); Dvojitý ventil (nezávislý); Jeden ventil (F-nástavec); Rovný (bez ventilu); Jiné
sl-SI: Konfiguracija ventilov tenorske pozavne: Dvojni ventil (odvisen); Dvojni ventil (neodvisen); Enojni ventil (F-nastavek); Ravno (brez ventila); Drugo
ru: Конфигурация клапанов тенор-тромбона: Двойной вентиль (зависимый); Двойной вентиль (независимый); Одинарный вентиль (F-крона); Прямой (без вентиля); Другое
ja: テナートロンボーンバルブ構成: デュアルバルブ (ディペンデント); デュアルバルブ (インディペンデント); シングルバルブ (Fアタッチメント); ストレート (バルブなし); その他
it: Configurazione della valvola del trombone tenore: Valvola doppia (dipendente); Valvola doppia (indipendente); Valvola singola (ritorta in Fa); Dritto (senza valvola); Altro